Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1010
Indecency with
an animal; penalty.

A person commits indecency with an animal
when such person subjects an animal to sexual penetration as defined in section
28-318. Indecency with an animal is a Class III misdemeanor. A person convicted under this section may also be subject
to section 28-1019.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 216;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 28-1003;

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 16;

Laws 2013, LB329, § 4.